Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-3701
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-3701 to 48-3704 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Statewide Workforce and Education Reporting System Act.

Laws 2020, LB1160, § 1.